Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1905
Violation; penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01 shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1943, c. 154, § 5, p. 564;

R.S.1943, § 71-1905;

Laws 1945, c. 171, § 5, p. 550;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 163;

Laws 1995, LB 451, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 23;

Laws 2002, LB 93, § 11.